North Carolina, session 2025, HB16.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 120-32.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(b1) The Legislative Services Officer shall display the national motto "In God We Trust"
directly above and behind the dais of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the
President of the Senate. The display shall be consistent with the historic and patriotic display of
the national motto located directly above and behind the dais of the Speaker of the United States
House of Representatives."
SECTION 2. To cover costs associated with implementing the requirement set forth
in G.S. 120-32.1(b1), as enacted by Section 1 of this act, the Legislative Services Officer shall
first use any funds gifted or otherwise provided to the State by a private individual or entity for
this purpose. To the extent any funds received in accordance with this section are deemed
unappropriated, the funds are hereby appropriated for the purpose set forth in this section.
SECTION 3. If no funds are gifted or otherwise provided in accordance with Section
2 of this act by no later than 90 days from the effective date of this act, the Legislative Services
Officer may use funds available to cover any costs incurred from implementing the requirement
set forth in G.S. 120-32.1(b1), as enacted by Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H16-v-1*